Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202688-548
Federal licensee; duties; commission; grain probe; duties; violation; penalty.

(1) Any grain dealer, person, firm, corporation, or association in this state licensed under the federal United States Warehouse Act shall (a) annually notify the commission in writing of such license and shall notify the commission at once in writing if the license is terminated, canceled, or suspended and (b) post notification of such licensee's bond under the United States Warehouse Act in a conspicuous place of business listing the total amount of bond on the stored grain.

(2) No warehouse licensee, licensee under the federal United States Warehouse Act, or grain dealer licensed pursuant to section 75-903 shall use end-intake air probes that are not approved by the commission to collect a sample from a load of grain to determine foreign material content. The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations regarding approval of grain probes. Any person who violates this subsection shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

Laws 1987, LB 164, § 24;

Laws 2026, LB894, § 8.
July 18, 2026